Kentucky statutes. TITLE II Legislative Branch
Kentucky Legislative Ethics Commission

6.651.
Establishment of Kentucky Legislative Ethics Commission — Membership — Terms.

The Kentucky Legislative Ethics Commission is established as an independent authority and shall be an agency of the legislative department of state government.

The commission shall be composed of nine (9) members, not less than three (3) of whom shall be members of the largest minority party in the state. The members shall be appointed in the following manner: four (4) members shall be appointed by the President of the Senate, four (4) members shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House, and one (1) member shall be appointed by the Legislative Research Commission. No member of the General Assembly shall be eligible for appointment to the commission.

The members of the commission shall be appointed within sixty (60) days of February 18, 1993. The Speaker of the House shall appoint one (1) member for an initial term of one (1) year, one (1) for a term of two (2) years, one (1) for a term of three (3) years, and one (1) for a term of four (4) years; the President of the Senate shall appoint one (1) member for a term of two (2) years, one (1) member for an initial term of three (3) years, and two (2) members for a term of four (4) years. The Legislative Research Commission shall appoint one (1) member for an initial term of three (3) years. Thereafter all appointments shall be for a full four (4) years.

Vacancies shall be filled by appointment by the original appointing authority in the same manner as the original appointments.

Each member shall be a citizen of the United States and a resident of this Commonwealth. A member of the commission shall not be a public servant, other than in his capacity as a member of the commission or in his capacity as a special judge; a candidate for any public office; a legislative agent; an employer of a legislative agent; or a spouse or child of any of these individuals while serving as a member of the commission. In the two (2) years immediately preceding the date of his appointment, a member shall not have served as a fundraiser, as defined in KRS 121.170(2), for a candidate for Governor or the General Assembly.

Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, a member of the commission shall serve a term of four (4) years and may be reappointed.

While serving on the commission, a member shall not:

Serve as a fundraiser for a slate of candidates for Governor and Lieutenant Governor, or candidate for Attorney General, Auditor of Public Accounts, or the General Assembly;

Contribute to a slate of candidates for Governor and Lieutenant Governor, or candidate for Attorney General, Auditor of Public Accounts, or the General Assembly;

Serve as an officer in a political party; or

Participate in the management or conduct of the political campaign of a candidate.

A member shall be removed only by the Legislative Research Commission, and only for cause.

History.

Enact. Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 37, effective September 16, 1993; 1996, ch. 211, § 2, effective July 15, 1996.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Since Chapter 4 of Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), contained an emergency clause [§ 92] it became effective as a whole when the Governor tendered the bill, which he had signed, to the Secretary of State on February 18, 1993. However, section 87 (13) of Ch. 4 of Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.) provided that, except as provided in §§ 88, 89, and 90, §§ 1-84 of the Act should become effective two hundred ten (210) days after the effective date of the Act, September 16, 1993; other subsections within § 87 establish a transition schedule with other specific dates calculated from the effective date of the Act. Such schedule is actually a listing of deadlines within which certain actions called for in § 87 of the Act are to be completed. Such schedule is as follows: “within 45 days of the effective date of the act” = on or before April 5, 1993; “within 60 days of the effective date of the act” = on or before April 19, 1993; “within 75 days of the effective date of the act” = on or before May 4, 1993; “within 90 days of the effective date of the act” = on or before May 19, 1993; “within 150 days of the effective date of the act” = on or before July 19, 1993; “within 180 days of the effective date of the act” = on or before August 17, 1993; “two hundred ten (210) days after the effective date of the act” = September 16, 1993.

OAG 93-25

.

6.655.
Violations inquired into by board — Disciplinary action. [Repealed.]

6.656.
Chair and vice chair — Meetings — Compensation of members.

The chair and the vice chair of the commission shall be elected by a majority vote of the members of the commission. The chair and the vice chair shall serve terms of one (1) year and may be reelected. The chair shall preside at meetings of the commission. The vice chair shall preside in the absence or disability of the chair.

The commission shall meet within ninety (90) days of February 18, 1993. The time and place of the meeting shall be determined by the chair. Thereafter, the commission shall meet at such times deemed necessary at the call of the chair or a majority of its members. A quorum shall consist of five (5) or more members. An affirmative vote of five (5) or more members shall be necessary for commission action.

A member of the commission shall receive one hundred dollars ($100) per day and reimbursement for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of his official duties as a member of the commission for meeting days and for a maximum of two (2) nonmeeting days per month devoted to commission-related work.

History.

Enact. Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 43, effective September 16, 1993; 2000, ch. 493, § 1, effective July 14, 2000.

6.660.
Avoidance of economic opportunity — Guidelines. [Repealed.]

6.661.
Executive director — Staff.

The commission may employ an executive director who shall serve at the pleasure of the commission.

The executive director shall:

Administer the daily business of the commission and perform the duties assigned by the commission; and

Employ and remove other personnel as necessary to carry out the provisions of this code.

The commission shall fix the compensation of its staff, and the compensation shall be commensurate with that paid to executive branch officials with a similar level of responsibilities.

The staff of the commission shall be exempt from the provisions of KRS

18A.005

to

18A.202

.

A member of the staff of the commission during his term of employment shall be subject to the provisions of KRS 6.651(8).

History.

Enact. Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 38, effective September 16, 1993.

6.665.
Disclosure of economic interests — Exceptions — Guidelines. [Repealed.]

6.666.
Powers of commission — Authority to promulgate administrative regulations — Lists of legislative agents — Trust and agency account.

The commission shall have jurisdiction over the administration of this code and enforcement of the civil penalties prescribed by this code.

The commission shall have jurisdiction over the disposition of complaints filed pursuant to KRS

6.686

.

The commission may administer oaths; issue subpoenas; compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of papers, books, accounts, documents, and testimony; and have the deposition of witnesses taken in the manner prescribed by the Kentucky Rules of Civil Procedure for taking depositions in civil actions. If a person disobeys or refuses to comply with a subpoena, or if a witness refuses to testify to a matter regarding which he may be lawfully interrogated, the Franklin Circuit Court may, on application of the commission, compel the obedience by proceedings for contempt as in the case of disobedience of a subpoena issued from the Circuit Court or a refusal to testify in Circuit Court. Each witness subpoenaed under this section shall receive for his attendance the fees and mileage provided for witnesses in Circuit Court, which shall be audited and paid upon the presentation of proper vouchers sworn to by the witness.

The commission may render advisory opinions in accordance with KRS

6.681

.

The commission shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to implement this code.

The commission shall prescribe and provide forms for reports, statements, notices, and other documents required by this code.

The commission shall determine whether the required statements and reports have been filed and, if filed, whether they conform with the requirements of this code. The commission shall promptly give notice to the filer to correct or explain any omission or deficiency.

Unless otherwise provided in this code, the commission shall make each report and statement filed under this code available for public inspection and copying during regular office hours at the expense of any person requesting copies of them and at a charge not to exceed actual cost, not including the cost of staff required.

The commission may preapprove leases or contracts pursuant to KRS

6.741

.

The commission shall compile and maintain a current index organized alphabetically by name of legislative agent and name of employer of all reports and statements filed with the commission in order to facilitate public access to the reports and statements.

The commission shall preserve all filed statements and reports for at least two (2) years from the date of receipt.

The commission shall provide to the Legislative Research Commission and each member of the General Assembly a list of every legislative agent and employer registered with the commission, including the name of each entity he represents and the date of his registration. The list shall be furnished on or before the tenth day of every month. Changes in the lists shall be furnished on Friday of each week that the General Assembly is convened in regular or extraordinary session.

Upon the sine die adjournment of a regular session of the General Assembly, the commission shall provide to the Registry of Election Finance a list of each person who was registered as a legislative agent or employer at any point during the period in which the General Assembly was convened in regular session. Upon the convening, and within fifteen (15) days after the sine die adjournment of, any extraordinary session, the commission shall provide to the Registry of Election Finance a list of each person who was registered as a legislative agent or employer at any point during that period.

In order to carry out the provisions of this code, the commission may contract with any public or private agency or educational institution or any individual for research studies, the gathering of information, the printing and publication of its reports, consulting, or for any other purpose necessary to discharge the duties of the commission.

The commission may conduct research concerning governmental ethics and implement any public educational programs it considers necessary to give effect to this code.

No later than December 1 of each year, the commission shall report to the Legislative Research Commission on the commission’s activities in the preceding fiscal year. The report shall include, but not be limited to, a summary of commission determinations and advisory opinions. The report may contain recommendations on matters within the commission’s jurisdiction.

No later than July 1 of each odd-numbered year, beginning July 1, 1995, the commission shall submit a report to the Legislative Research Commission which shall contain recommendations for any statutory revisions it deems necessary.

All funds received by the commission from any source shall be placed in a trust and agency account for use by the commission in the administration and enforcement of the provisions of this code. Funds in the trust and agency account shall not lapse.

History.

Enact. Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 41, effective September 16, 1993; 1996, ch. 211, § 3, effective July 15, 1996.

6.670.
Conflict of interest on legislative matters — Guidelines. [Repealed.]

6.675.
Offer of economic opportunity to legislator by persons with legislative interest. [Repealed.]

6.680.
Acceptance of economic opportunity by person with whom legislator maintains close economic association. [Repealed.]